Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2608
Sales of swine; authorized; when.

Section 54-2607 does not apply to any direct, spot, or cash purchase of swine if the following requirements are met:

(1) The difference in price is based on: (a) A payment method specifying prices paid for criteria relating to carcass merit; or (b) actual and quantifiable costs related to transporting and acquiring the swine by the packer; and

(2) After making the payment to a seller, the packer reports the payment information required under section 54-2613, including the payment method specifying prices paid for criteria relating to carcass merit and transportation and acquisition costs.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 8.